Indiana, session 2026, HB1170.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-28-9-26, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) For each school year beginning after June
30, 2025, if a school corporation determines that the school corporation
cannot establish a minimum salary of forty-five thousand dollars
($45,000) for each full-time teacher, the school corporation and the
department must comply with the requirements of subsections (b) (c)
through (d). (e). This subsection expires July 1, 2027.
(b) For each school year beginning after June 30, 2027, if a
school corporation determines that the school corporation cannot
establish a minimum salary of sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) for
each full-time teacher, the school corporation must comply with
the requirements of subsections (c) through (e).
(b) (c) For each state fiscal year that a school corporation fails to
meet the minimum salary requirements for full-time teachers under
subsection (a) (before its expiration) or subsection (b), the
department shall submit in both a written and an electronic format a
2026 IN 1170—LS 6240/DI 110


notice to the school corporation's:
(1) superintendent;
(2) school business officer; and
(3) governing body;
that the school corporation failed to meet the requirements set forth in
subsection (a) (before its expiration) or subsection (b) for the
applicable state fiscal year.
(c) (d) If a school corporation's governing body receives a notice
from the department under subsection (b), (c), the school corporation
shall do the following:
(1) Publicly acknowledge receipt of the notice from the
department at the governing body's next public meeting.
(2) Enter into the governing body's official minutes for the
meeting described in subdivision (1) acknowledgment of the
notice.
(3) Not later than thirty (30) days after the meeting described in
subdivision (1), publish on the school corporation's website:
(A) the department's notice; and
(B) any relevant individual reports prepared by the
department.
(d) (e) If the department determines a school corporation that
received one (1) or more notices from the department under subsection
(b) (c) has met the minimum salary requirements required under
subsection (a) (before its expiration) or subsection (b) for a
subsequent state fiscal year, the school corporation may remove from
the school corporation's website any:
(1) notices the school corporation received under subsection (b);
(c); and
(2) relevant individual reports prepared by the department under
subsection (c)(3). (d)(3).
2026 IN 1170—LS 6240/DI 110